Utah statutes.
20A-2-103.   Special elections -- Lists of voters.

(1) (a)  A special registration of voters is not required for a statewide or local special election.

(b)  The last official or revised register is the register for the statewide or local special election.

(2)  If a statewide or local special election is held at the same time and place as a regular general election, a municipal general election, or a primary, persons qualified to vote at those elections may also vote in the statewide or local special election.

(3)  If a statewide or local special election is held on a date other than the date of a regular or municipal general election, the county clerk of each county in which the municipality or entity is wholly or partly located shall register persons to vote in that election during regular office hours in accordance with the requirements of this chapter.

(4)  The county clerk of each county in which the entity holding the statewide or local special election is located shall make registration lists or copies of those lists available at each polling place for use by registered voters entitled to use those polling places.

